Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1526
Hearing instrument; repurchase; medical evaluation, when required.

A purchaser of a hearing instrument shall not be required to obtain a medical evaluation for the repurchase of a hearing instrument after a medical evaluation has been obtained for certain otologic conditions that are permanent and would be reidentified at each hearing assessment. Such conditions shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Visible congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear;

(2) Unilateral or asymmetric hearing loss, assuming no change in thresholds; and

(3) Audiometric air-bone gap equal to or greater than fifteen decibels at five hundred hertz, one thousand hertz, and two thousand hertz.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 30.